New York, session 2025-2026, A2576.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 103 of the general municipal law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 17 to read as follows: 3 17. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, in the case of 4 contracts for goods, services, or management in the operation of a 5 school's food service, a board of education, on behalf of its school 6 district, or a board of cooperative educational services, shall have the 7 authority to award such contracts on the basis of certain scoring crite- 8 ria specifically set forth in the solicitation documents determined by 9 the procurement office or school board to be essential to the provision 10 of a safe and nutritious food service program with price being the 11 primary factor and most heavily weighted but not the determinative 12 factor. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 14 deemed repealed five years after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03265-01-5